Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska29-755
Nonwaiver by this state.

Nothing in sections 29-729 to 29-758 contained shall be deemed to constitute a waiver by this state of its right, power or privilege to try such demanded person for crime committed within this state, or of its right, power or privilege to regain custody of such person by extradition proceedings or otherwise for the purpose of trial, sentence or punishment for any crime committed within this state, nor shall any proceedings had under sections 29-729 to 29-758 which result in, or fail to result in, extradition be deemed a waiver by this state of any of its rights, privileges or jurisdiction in any way whatsoever.

Laws 1963, c. 159, § 27, p. 568.